District of Columbia statutes.
47-2885.16

Inspections.

(a)

Persons designated by the Mayor shall be permitted, after presenting proper identification, to enter at reasonable times any pharmacy or drug outlet for the purpose of making inspections to determine compliance with this part or with other laws or regulations applicable to the practice of pharmacy. Persons designated by the Mayor shall be pharmacists for the purpose of making inspections to determine compliance with those sections of this part and other applicable laws and regulations regarding the practice of pharmacy as defined within this part.

(b)

This inspection may include, but shall not be limited to, the examination of the pharmacy’s records, including prescriptions, and the obtaining of information and samples pertaining to drugs on hand or dispensed.

History

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-98, § 17, 27 DCR 3528
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-2885.10.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2016.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.